Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 2

Contraband

70-6-201. Confiscation and disposal of wildlife and other articles illegally taken or used.

All officers of the wildlife resources agency, sheriffs and their deputies shall seize and take possession of any and all furs, fish, wild animals, wild birds, guns, rods, reels, nets, creels, boats or other instruments, tackle or devices that have been used, transported or possessed contrary to any laws or regulations promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission, and impound and take them before the court trying the person arrested.

Upon complaint showing probable cause for believing that any of the wild animals, wild birds or fish protected by any law or regulation are being illegally kept in any building, car or receptacle, any court having jurisdiction may issue a search warrant and cause such building, car or receptacle to be searched. Any wild bird, wild animal, fish, articles, instruments, or devices seized in accordance with this section, shall be impounded by the arresting officer and taken before the court trying the person arrested.

Upon conviction, the court or jury trying the case shall, except as provided in §§ 70-4-116 — 70-4-118, determine whether or not the things seized shall be declared contraband.

When any item is declared contraband, the court shall enter an order accordingly and the contraband property shall be placed in the custody of the arresting officer, to be delivered to the executive director for disposition. The executive director shall destroy or cause to be destroyed any prohibited device or any device deemed by the executive director to be in a dangerous condition. Any contraband property that is not destroyed shall be transferred to the commissioner of general services to be sold at public sale in the manner authorized for surplus property by title 12, chapter 2.

All proceeds from the sale of confiscated articles shall be deposited in the wildlife resources fund.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 39 (Williams, § 5178.68); 1959, ch. 145, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7, 9; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-706; Acts 2007, ch. 65, § 1; 2009, ch. 213, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Penalties and Forfeitures, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. A judge does not have discretion pursuant to T.C.A. § 39-17-1317(a) to return a rifle used to violate the hunting laws, OAG 07-026, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (3/9/07).

70-6-202. Property used in violation of §§ 70-4-116 — 70-4-118 declared contraband — Seizure and sale.

Any firearm, equipment, appliance or conveyance used in violation of §§ 70-4-116 — 70-4-118, including any truck, automobile, boat, airplane, or other vehicle, other than a common carrier, and in which any deer or bear is located, or that is used in transporting such animals in violation of this title, is hereby declared contraband property and shall be confiscated and forfeited to the state upon seizure.

Any motor vehicle that is seized as contraband property, that has been finally forfeited to the state of Tennessee, and that has not been ordered by any court or competent authority to be returned to any claimant shall be sold at public sale by the commissioner of general services when the same has been turned over to the commissioner by the executive director as now authorized by law; provided, that, notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, any truck, automobile, boat, airplane or other vehicle seized and forfeited under subsection (a) may be used, with the approval of the executive director, by wildlife officers, to enforce the fish and wildlife laws, for a period not to exceed two (2) years; and provided further, that the seized item is similar in kind and not substantially greater in value than like equipment that is procured and used by the wildlife resources agency in its operations.

When any seizure results in an arrest and the person charged is found to be not guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction, such property shall be returned by the trial court. When the verdict of not guilty is rendered by a court of general sessions, the executive director shall have the right to appeal to the circuit court of the county where such verdict was rendered for a hearing de novo solely on the question of the propriety of the seizure of any property so seized as contraband and make disposition accordingly.

The court or jury determining whether a violation of § 70-4-116, § 70-4-117, or § 70-4-118, occurred shall also determine, in the same manner as provided in § 70-6-201, whether property seized pursuant to this section is contraband and should be forfeited to the state.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 45 (Williams, § 5178.74); 1959, ch. 300, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1963, ch. 105, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 6, 7; Acts 1975, ch. 41, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 51-707; Acts 1998, ch. 909, § 3; 1999, ch. 91, § 3; 2009, ch. 213, § 2; 2011, ch. 283, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 283, § 7 provided that the commission is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act, which amended subsection (a). All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Game and Game Laws, § 3; 20 Tenn. Juris., Penalties and Forfeitures, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Law of Squirrels, Robins, Snakes, Cats, Raccoons and Elephants (Lewis L. Laska), 26 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 30 (1990).